Maryland, session 2025, SB0420.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Natural Resources
8–205.
(a) In this section, “Fund” means the State Lakes Protection and Restoration
Fund.
(b) There is a State Lakes Protection and Restoration Fund.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0420*

SENATE BILL 420
(c) The purpose of the Fund is to protect and restore [State–owned or
State–managed lakes] DEEP CREEK LAKE by:
(1) Removing sediment;
(2) Treating contaminated sediment;
(3) Preventing the spread of invasive species;
(4) Improving ecological and recreational value; and
(5) Taking any other action the Department determines is necessary.
(d) The Secretary shall administer the Fund.
(e) (1) The Fund is a special, nonlapsing fund that is not subject to § 7–302 of
the State Finance and Procurement Article.
(2) The State Treasurer shall hold the Fund separately, and the
Comptroller shall account for the Fund.
(f) The Fund consists of:
(1) Money appropriated in the State budget to the Fund; and
(2) Any other money from any other source accepted for the benefit of the
Fund.
(g) The Fund may be used only for the protection or restoration of [State–owned
or State–managed lakes] DEEP CREEK LAKE by:
(1) Removing sediment;
(2) Treating contaminated sediment;
(3) Preventing the spread of invasive species;
(4) Improving ecological and recreational value; and
(5) Taking any other action the Department determines is necessary.
(h) (1) The State Treasurer shall invest the money of the Fund in the same
manner as other State money may be invested.
(2) Any interest earnings of the Fund shall be credited to the Fund.

SENATE BILL 420 3
(i) Expenditures from the Fund may be made only in accordance with the State
budget.
(j) Money expended from the Fund for the protection or restoration of
[State–owned or State–managed lakes] DEEP CREEK LAKE is supplemental to and is not
intended to take the place of funding that would otherwise be appropriated for the
protection or restoration of [State–owned or State–managed lakes] DEEP CREEK LAKE.
(k) For fiscal year [2020 and each fiscal year thereafter] 2027, the Governor shall
include in the annual budget bill an appropriation of $1,000,000 to the Fund.
Chapter 698 of the Acts of 2018, as amended by Chapter 39 of the Acts of 2022
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2018. It shall remain effective for a period of [7] 9 years and, at the end of June 30,
[2025] 2027, this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be
abrogated and of no further force and effect.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2025.